Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-228
Board; practice and procedure in accordance with rules and regulations.

The practice and procedure of the board, with respect to any investigation authorized by sections 71-225 to 71-237, shall be in accordance with rules and regulations to be promulgated by the board, which shall provide for reasonable notice to all persons affected by the orders to be made by the board and an opportunity for any such persons to be heard, either in person or by counsel, and introduce testimony in their behalf at any hearing to be held for that purpose.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 4(1), p. 555.